Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.430

Transfer of system from county to water-sewer district—Alternative method.

The provisions of RCW 36.94.410 and 36.94.420 provide an alternative method of accomplishing the transfer permitted by those sections and do not impose additional conditions upon the exercise of powers vested in water-sewer districts and counties.

[ 1999 c 153 s 49; 1984 c 147 s 3.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.